Hawaii statutes.
[§353C-3] Deputy directors; appointment.
The director shall appoint, without regard to chapter 76, three deputy
directors to serve at the director's pleasure. Unless otherwise assigned by
the director, one deputy director shall oversee the correctional programs and
facilities of the department, one deputy director shall oversee the law
enforcement programs of the department, and one deputy director shall oversee
administration of the department. [L 1989, c 211, pt of §6; am L 2000, c 253,
§150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next